Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-820
Contracts awarded
by Tax Commissioner; notices of hearings; orders and decisions; delivery.

Notices of hearings related to contracts awarded by the Tax
Commissioner and copies of all orders and decisions of the Tax Commissioner
concerning such contracts shall be mailed to the address of record
of the appropriate party or parties.

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 20;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 40;

Laws 2012, LB727, § 13.